Hawaii statutes.
[§39A-351] Special purpose revenue bonds
not a general obligation of the State. No holder or holders of any special
purpose revenue bonds issued under this part shall ever have the right to
compel any exercise of the taxing power of the State to pay the bonds or the
interest thereon and no moneys other than the revenues pledged to the bonds
shall be applied to the payment thereof. Each special purpose revenue bond
issued under this part shall recite in substance that the bond, including
interest thereon, is not a general obligation of the State and is payable
solely from the revenues pledged to the payment thereof, and that the bond is
not secured, directly or indirectly, by the full faith and credit or the
general credit of the State or by any revenues or taxes of the State other than
the revenues specifically pledged thereto. [L 2012, c 147, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next